District of Columbia statutes.
46-401.01

Marriages void ab initio — In general.

The following marriages are prohibited in the District of Columbia and shall be absolutely void ab initio, without being so decreed, and their nullity may be shown in any collateral proceedings, namely:

(1)

Repealed.

(2)

Repealed.

(2A)

The marriage of a person with a person’s grandparent, grandparent’s spouse, spouse’s grandparent, parent’s sibling, parent, step-parent, spouse’s parent, child, spouse’s child, child’s spouse, sibling, child’s child, child’s child’s spouse, spouse’s child’s child, sibling’s child.

(3)

The marriage of any persons either of whom has been previously married and whose previous marriage has not been terminated by death or a decree of divorce.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1391, ch. 854, § 1283
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-9,§ 3(a), 56 DCR 3797
redesignated as § 1283a, Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-110,§ 2(a), 57 DCR 27

Cross References

Proceedings to annul marriage, see §§ 16-903, 16-904.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-903, § 46-401, and § 46-405.01.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 46-401.
1981 Ed., § 30-101.
1973 Ed., § 30-101.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-9 repealed pars. (1) and (2); and added par. (2A).

Editor's Notes

Former § 46-401 was recodified as § 46-401.01 by D.C. Law 18-110, § 2(a).